zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 滑板车 > 电动滑板车部件 > 车把和控制装置: 电动滑板车车把手柄; 电动滑板车车把; 油门控制装置
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinetes > Piezas para patinetes eléctricos > Manillares y mandos: Empuñaduras de manillar para scooters eléctricos; Manillares para scooters eléctricos; Controles de aceleración
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Skiroji > Deli za e-skiroje > Krmila in ročke: Ročaji za krmilo za električni skiro; Krmila za e-skiroje; Krmilniki plina
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Romobili za vožnju > Dijelovi za električne romobile > Upravljači i komande: Ručke za upravljač za električni skuter; Upravljači za električni romobil; Kontrole gasa
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Xe trượt scooter đạp chân > Phụ tùng xe máy điện > Tay lái và điều khiển: Bọc tay lái xe điện scooter; Tay lái xe điện scooter; Bộ điều khiển bướm ga
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Scooterrijden > E-scooters onderdelen > Stuur en bedieningselementen: Handvatten voor e-scooters; Sturen voor e-scooters; Gashendels
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Koloběžky a skútry > Elektroskútry – náhradní díly > Řídítka a ovládací prvky: Gripy na řídítka elektrokoloběžek; Řídítka na elektrokoloběžky; Ovladače plynu
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Scooters > Peças de scooters elétricas > Guiadores e comandos: Punhos de guiador de trotineta elétrica; Guiadores de trotineta elétrica; Controlos de aceleração
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Scutere pentru grădinărit > Piese pentru trotinete electrice > Ghidoane și comenzi: Manșoane pentru ghidonul trotinetei electrice; Ghidoane pentru trotinete electrice; Comenzi accelerație
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キックスクーター > 電動スクーターパーツ > ハンドルバー・コントロール: 電動スクーター用ハンドルグリップ; 電動スクーター用ハンドルバー; スロットルコントロール
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на самокатах > Детали для электросамокатов > Рули и элементы управления: Грипсы для электросамокатов; Рули для электросамокатов; Ручки газа
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sparkesykler > Deler til el-scootere > Styre og kontroller: Håndtak for elsparkesykler; Styrer for elsparkesykler; Gasskontroller
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Motoros rollerek > Elektromosroller-alkatrészek > Kormányok és kezelőszervek: Elektromos roller markolatok; Elektromos roller kormányok; Gázkarok
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Scooter > Parti di scooter elettrici > Manubri e comandi: Manopole per monopattini elettrici; Manubri per monopattini elettrici; Comandi dell'acceleratore
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Paspirtukai > Elektrinių paspirtukų dalys > Vairai ir valdikliai: Elektrinio paspirtuko vairo rankenos; Elektrinio paspirtuko rankenėlės; Akceleratoriaus valdikliai
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Riding Scooters > E-Scooters Parts > Handlebars & Controls: E-Scooter Handlebar Grips; E-Scooter Handlebars; Throttle Controls
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kolobežky > Diely E-kolobežiek > Riadidlá a ovládacie prvky: Rukoväte riadidiel pre elektrické kolobežky; Riadidlá pre e-kolobežky; Ovládacie prvky škrtiacej klapky
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на тротинетки > Части за електрически тротинетки > Кормила и управления: Ръкохватки за кормило за електрически скутери; Кормила за електрически тротинетки; Контролни механизми за дросел
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Trottinettes > Pièces de trottinettes électriques > Guidons et commandes: Poignées de guidon de trottinettes électriques; Guidons de trottinettes électriques; Accélérateurs
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Skotrar > E-skoterdelar > Styre och reglage: Styrhandtag till elscootrar; Styren till elscootrar; Gasreglage
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 滑板車 > 電動滑板車零件 > 手把與控制器: 電動滑板車把手套; 電動滑板車把手; 油門控制器
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Μοτοποδήλατα (Riding Scooters) > Ανταλλακτικά για ηλεκτρικά πατίνια > Τιμόνια & ελεγκτήρες: Χειρολαβές (grips) για τιμόνια ηλεκτρικών πατινιών; Τιμόνια ηλεκτρικών πατινιών; Χειριστήρια γκαζιού
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Løbehjul > Dele til elløbehjul > Styr og betjeningselementer: Styrgreb til e-løbehjul; Styr til e-løbehjul; Gaskontrol
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Motonetas > Peças de patinetes elétricos > Guidões e controles: Manoplas para patinetes elétricos; Guidões para patinetes elétricos; Controles de acelerador
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Roller > Ersatzteile für E-Scooters > Lenker & Bedienelemente: E-Scooter-Lenkergriffe; E-Scooter-Lenker; Gashebel
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > สกูทเตอร์สำหรับขับขี่ > ชิ้นส่วนสกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า > แฮนด์บาร์และระบบควบคุม: ปลอกแฮนด์สกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า; แฮนด์สกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า; คันเร่ง
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Potkulaudat > Sähköpotkulautojen osat > Ohjaustangot ja ohjaimet: Sähköpotkulautojen kahvat; Sähköpotkulautojen ohjaustangot; Kaasukahvat
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Hulajnogi > Części do hulajnóg elektrycznych > Kierownice i elementy sterujące: Gripy na kierownicę do hulajnóg elektrycznych; Kierownice do hulajnóg elektrycznych; Manetki gazu
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 씽씽이 > 전기 스쿠터 부품 > 핸들바 및 컨트롤: 전동 스쿠터 핸들바 그립; 전동 스쿠터 핸들바; 스로틀 컨트롤러
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Scooter Motorlar > E-Scooter Parçaları > Gidonlar ve Kumandalar: E-scooter gidon elcikleri; E-scooter gidonları; Gaz kontrolleri